Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.017

Director's subpoenas—Unauthorized banking activity.

(1) The director or authorized assistants may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed documents, records, or evidence are located, or in Thurston county. The application must:

(a) State that an order is sought under this section;

(b) Adequately specify the documents, records, evidence, or testimony; and

(c) Include a declaration made under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents, records, evidence, or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.

(2) When an application under this section is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the documents, records, evidence, or testimony.

(3) The director or authorized assistants may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation. An application for court approval is subject to the fee and process set forth in RCW 36.18.012(3).

(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section are applicable to the director's enforcement authority under this title against persons engaged in unauthorized banking activity and persons, other than a bank authorized under this title, whom the director has reason to believe are in violation of this title. This section does not limit the authority of the director to investigate or examine a bank authorized under this title without applying for or obtaining a superior court order or issuing a subpoena pursuant to this section.

[ 2014 c 37 s 261.]